Utah statutes.
72-10-203.   Division and counties, municipalities, and airport authorities authorized to acquire and regulate airports.

(1)  The division and municipalities, counties, and airport authorities may acquire, establish, construct, expand, own, lease, control, equip, improve, maintain, operate, regulate, and police airports for the use of aircraft and may use for these purposes any available property that is owned or controlled by the division or by a municipality, county, or airport authority.

(2)  A county may not exercise the authority conferred in this section outside of its geographical limits except  jointly with an adjoining county.

